North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-44 Dietitians and Nutritionists
43-44-20.
Limited practice without a license.

Upon prior written application to the board, a foreign practitioner practicing under this section may provide medical nutrition therapy or nutrition care services for the purpose of treating or managing a disease or medical condition in this state under section 43-51-05 if the practitioner is acting within the scope of practice designated by the foreign practitioner’s license and by this title without obtaining a license from the board if the services are provided for no more than thirty full or partial days per year. The one-year period commences on the date the written application is approved by the board. An application from a foreign practitioner under this section must include verified documentation from the appropriate licensing authority which identifies the requirements for licensure in that jurisdiction and which confirms that the practitioner is licensed and in good standing in that jurisdiction and any other information requested by the board. The board may require payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars or other fee established by the board by administrative rule, not to exceed the higher of twenty-five dollars or one-tenth of the fee for an annual license from the board, as a condition of approving an application under this section. A foreign practitioner is subject to the regulatory and disciplinary provisions of section 43-51-08 and this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 323, § 21, effective July 1, 2021.

43-44-21.
Criminal history record checks.

The board may require an applicant for licensure or renewal to submit to a statewide and nationwide criminal history record check. The nationwide criminal history record check must be conducted in the manner provided in section 12-60-24. Refusal to consent to a criminal history record check may constitute grounds for the board to deny licensure to an applicant. All costs associated with obtaining a background check are the responsibility of the applicant.

The board may request a criminal history record check for an applicant returning to active status as a licensed registered dietitian or licensed nutritionist.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 323, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.